Hawaii, session 2026, SB108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that as working harbors, many of Hawaii's harbors produce large amounts of noise.  While the department of transportation has the authority to adopt rules regulating the manner in which vessels may enter and moor, anchor, or dock in the commercial harbors, ports, and roadsteads, this authority does not allow the department of transportation to adopt rules to regulate excessive and harmful noises emanating from these vessels.  The legislature further finds that granting the department of transportation this authority will help alleviate the concerns of individuals affected by the noise from Hawaii's harbors. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the director of transportation to adopt rules that regulate and limit noise from vessels using the commercial harbors, ports, roadsteads, docks, wharves, piers, quays, bulkheads, and landings of the State. SECTION 2.  Section 266-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The director of transportation may adopt rules as necessary: (1)  To regulate the manner in which all vessels may enter and moor, anchor, or dock in the commercial harbors, ports, and roadsteads of the State, or move from one dock, wharf, pier, quay, bulkhead, landing, anchorage, or mooring to another within the commercial harbors, ports, or roadsteads; (2)  For the examination, guidance, and control of harbor masters and their assistants and their conduct while on duty; (3)  For the embarking or disembarking of passengers; (4)  To regulate the allowable noise that may emanate from vessels while using the commercial harbors, ports, roadsteads, docks, wharves, piers, quays, bulkheads, and landings of the State, including by establishing noise limits; [(4)] (5)  For the expeditious and careful handling of freight, goods, wares, and merchandise of every kind that may be delivered for shipment or discharged on the commercial docks, wharves, piers, quays, bulkheads, or landings belonging to or controlled by the State; and [(5)] (6)  To define the duties and powers of carriers, shippers, and consignees respecting passengers, freight, goods, wares, and merchandise in and upon the docks, wharves, piers, quays, bulkheads, or landings within the commercial harbors, ports, and roadsteads of the State.  The director may also make further rules for the safety of the docks, wharves, piers, quays, bulkheads, and landings on, in, near, or affecting a commercial harbor and waterfront improvements belonging to or controlled by the State." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________